Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PILOT PROGRAM TO IMPROVE EDUCATIONAL OUTCOMES, SAFETY, AND ACCOUNTABILITY FOR STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Education must establish a grant program to fund a pilot program starting in the 2025-2026 school year. The program must: new text end new text begin (1) improve achievement and educational outcomes for students with disabilities; new text end new text begin (2) increase access to general education settings; new text end new text begin (3) foster positive school environments; and new text end new text begin (4) address service delivery costs. new text end new text begin (b) The program must involve collaboration with students, families, community leaders, and the Department of Education Special Education Advisory Panel to redesign inclusion frameworks that support continuous improvement and measure performance beyond test scores. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Selection process. new text end new text begin (a) Grantees must be selected based on proposals that: new text end new text begin (1) provide a detailed timeline for implementing program goals; new text end new text begin (2) describe a plan for how to provide an inclusive educational model and how the model can be adapted over time to meet the needs of all students; new text end new text begin (3) differentiate between mainstreaming and true inclusion models; new text end new text begin (4) address accessibility needs, classroom layouts, sensory accommodations, assistive technology, transition supports, appropriate staffing, and innovative ways to present classroom curricula, lessons, and special education services; new text end new text begin (5) address the overrepresentation of students of color in the most restrictive special education settings; new text end new text begin (6) identify how students in restrictive settings may be included in the general education classroom more in the general education model and what steps will be taken to provide special education services in the general education setting whenever feasible; new text end new text begin (7) prioritize neurodiversity-affirming practices, trauma-informed practices, student connection, and evidence-based developmentally appropriate practices; new text end new text begin (8) identify the prevention and early intervention strategies, including de-escalation, that may be used to meet the needs of students who become dysregulated; new text end new text begin (9) incorporate Universal Design for Learning principles; new text end new text begin (10) include measurable outcomes such as student achievement, extracurricular participation, restorative justice interventions, number of disciplinary referrals, suspensions and expulsions, and family and community engagement; and new text end new text begin (11) incorporate staff training on ableism and disability inclusion. new text end new text begin (b) The program team must include representatives from the Department of Education, school administrators, special education staff, parents, and students. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) By July 1, 2026, the Department of Education must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education detailing the pilot program's effectiveness, best practices, and cost-benefit analysis, including draft guidelines and professional development recommendations for implementing inclusion models. new text end new text begin (b) By July 1, 2027, the Department of Education must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education containing a comprehensive evaluation of the pilot program, including final best practice guidelines and assessment tools created to help Individualized Education Programs teams identify how to meet the needs of students in general education settings whenever possible and appropriate. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education to implement the pilot program to improve educational outcomes, safety, and accountability for students with disabilities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end